Illinois, session 104th, HB3843.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Counties Code is amended by adding Section 55-1192 as follows: 6    (55 ILCS 5/5-1192 new)7    Sec. 5-1192. Arterial street setbacks.8    (a) As used in this Section, "arterial street" means any 9U.S. or State numbered route, controlled access highway, or 10other major radial or circumferential street or highway 11designated by local authorities within the county as part of a 12major arterial system of streets or highways.13    (b) In counties with a population of over 3,000,000, the 14minimum setback distance for new developments is 150 feet away 15from any arterial street.